Washington statutes.
RCW 43.03.065

Subsistence and lodging expenses—Direct payment to suppliers authorized.

The allowances prescribed pursuant to RCW 43.03.050 as now or hereafter amended may be paid as reimbursements to individuals for subsistence and lodging expenses during official travel. Alternatively, amounts not exceeding those allowances may be paid directly to appropriate suppliers of subsistence and lodging, when more economical and advantageous to the state, under general rules and regulations adopted by the director of financial management with the advice of the state auditor. Payments to suppliers for subsistence and lodging expenses of individuals in travel status shall not result in a cost to the state in excess of what would be payable by way of reimbursements to the individuals involved.

[ 1979 c 151 s 85; 1977 ex.s. c 312 s 4.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Construction—1977 ex.s. c 312: See note following RCW 43.03.050.